Utah statutes.
78B-6-1233.   Report of referees to the courts of sales.

(1)  Once the sale of the property or any portion ordered to be sold is complete, the referees shall file a report with the court.

(2)  The report shall include:

(a)  a description of the different parcels of land sold to each purchaser;

(b)  the name of the purchaser;

(c)  the price paid or secured;

(d)  the terms and conditions of the sale; and

(e)  the securities, if any, taken.

(3)  The report shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the court.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

